Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.1361

Closing the achievement gap—Enhancing data collection and data system capacity—Securing federal funds.

The superintendent of public instruction shall take all actions necessary to secure federal funds to support enhancing data collection and data system capacity in order to monitor progress in closing the achievement gap and to support other innovations and model programs that align education reform and address disproportionality in the public school system.

[ 2009 c 468 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 468: See note following RCW 28A.300.136.